Nebraska, session 109, LB698.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB698 LB698
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 2, Initiative Law 2024, No. 436, is amended to
read:
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces
Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Labor;
(2) Employ means to permit to work;
(3) (3)(a) Employee means any individual employed by an employer,
but does not include:
(a) An an individual who works in Nebraska for fewer than eighty
hours in a calendar year; .
(b) An individual who is employed in agricultural employment of a
seasonal or other temporary nature;
(c) An (b) Employee does not include an "employee" as defined by 45
U.S.C. 351(d) who is subject to the federal Railroad Unemployment
Insurance Act, 45 U.S.C. 351 et seq.; or ;
(d) An individual under sixteen years of age;
(4)(a) Employer means any individual, partnership, limited liability
company, association, corporation, business trust, legal representative,
or organized group of persons who employs eleven one or more employees.
(b) Employer does not include the United States or the State of
Nebraska or its agencies, departments, or political subdivisions;
(5) Family member means:
(a) Any of the following, regardless of age: A biological, adopted,
or foster child, a stepchild, a legal ward, or a child to whom the
employee stands in loco parentis;
(b) A biological, foster, step, or adoptive parent or a legal
guardian of an employee or an employee's spouse;
(c) A person who stood in loco parentis to the employee or the
employee's spouse when the employee or employee's spouse was a minor
child;
(d) A person to whom the employee is legally married under the laws
-2-

LB698 LB698
2025 2025
of any state;
(e) A grandparent, grandchild, or sibling, whether of a biological,
foster, adoptive, or step relationship, of the employee or the employee's
spouse; or
(f) Any other individual related by blood to the employee or whose
close association with the employee is the equivalent of a family
relationship;
(6) Health care professional means any person licensed under any
federal or state law to provide medical or emergency services;
(7) Paid sick time means time that is compensated at the same hourly
rate and with the same benefits, including health care benefits, as the
employee typically earns during hours worked and that is provided by an
employer to an employee for the purposes described in section 4 of this
act, and in no case shall the amount of this hourly rate be less than
that provided under section 48-1203;
(8) Public health emergency means a declaration or proclamation
related to a public health threat, risk, disaster, or emergency that is
made or issued by a federal, state, or local official with the authority
to make or issue such a declaration or proclamation;
(9) Retaliatory personnel action means a denial of any right
guaranteed under the Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces Act and any
threat, discharge, suspension, demotion, reduction of hours or pay, or
other adverse action against an employee for exercising or attempting to
exercise any right guaranteed in the Nebraska Healthy Families and
Workplaces Act;
(10)(a) Small business means an employer with at least eleven but
fewer than twenty employees during a given week, including full-time,
part-time, or temporary employees.
(b) Small business does not include an employer that maintained
twenty or more employees on its payroll in each of twenty or more
calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year; and
-3-

LB698 LB698
2025 2025
(11) Year means a regular and consecutive twelve-month period as
determined by the employer.
Sec. 2. Section 8, Initiative Law 2024, No. 436, is amended to
read:
Sec. 8. (1) The Commissioner of Labor shall issue a citation to an
employer when an investigation reveals that the employer may have
violated the Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces Act.
(2) When a citation is issued, the commissioner shall notify the
employer of the proposed administrative penalty, if any, by certified
mail, by any other manner of delivery by which the United States Postal
Service can verify delivery, or by any method of service recognized under
Chapter 25, article 5. The administrative penalty shall not be more than
five hundred dollars in the case of a first violation and not more than
five thousand dollars in the case of a second or subsequent violation.
(3) The employer has fifteen working days after the date of the
citation or penalty to contest such citation or penalty. Notice of
contest shall be sent to the commissioner who shall provide a hearing in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(4) Any employer who has an unpaid citation for a violation of the
Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces Act shall be barred from
contracting with the state or any political subdivision until such
citation is paid. If a citation has been contested as described in
subsection (3) of this section, it shall not be considered an unpaid
citation under this subsection until after such contest has been
resolved.
(5) Citations issued under this section and the names of employers
who have been issued a citation shall be made available to the public
upon request, except that this subsection shall not apply to any
citations that are being contested as described in subsection (3) of this
section.
(6) An employee having a claim for a violation of the Nebraska
-4-

LB698 LB698
2025 2025
Healthy Families and Workplaces Act may institute suit for legal and
equitable relief in the proper court. In any action brought to enforce
the Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces Act, the court shall have
jurisdiction to grant such legal or equitable relief as the court deems
appropriate to effectuate the purposes of the act. If an employee
establishes a claim and secures judgment on the claim, such employee
shall also be entitled to recover the full amount of the judgment and all
costs of such suit, including reasonable attorney's fees.
(7) If an employee institutes suit against an employer under
subsection (6) of this section, any citation that is issued against an
employer under subsection (1) of this section and that relates directly
to the facts in dispute shall be admitted into evidence unless
specifically excluded by the court. If a citation has been contested as
described in subsection (3) of this section, it shall not be admitted
into evidence under this subsection until such contest has been resolved.
(8) A civil action brought under this section shall be commenced no
later than four calendar years after the cause of action accrues.
Sec. 3. Original sections 2 and 8, Initiative Law 2024, No. 436,
are repealed.
-5-